Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 13. Hathaway Scholarship Program

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 3, states:

“(a) The legislature recognizes that eligible institutions will have made substantial scholarship commitments to students who plan to enroll for the fall of 2006 school year by the time this act is enacted into law. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act:

“(i) For the 2006-2007 school year, any Hathaway scholarship provided under this act, except need based scholarships provided under W.S.

21-16-1306

, shall be reduced by the amount of the eligible institution's merit scholarship commitment made to that student for that school year, but the institution shall honor that commitment to the student in accordance with its terms for that year. For the 2006-2007 school year, if a student is eligible for a Hathaway scholarship, a student's acceptance of an eligible institution's merit scholarship commitment shall count toward the total eight (8) semesters of eligibility for a Hathaway scholarship;

“(ii) In subsequent years for students receiving Hathaway scholarships for the 2006-2007 school year to whom eligible institutions made institutional scholarship commitments beyond the 2006-2007 school year, the Hathaway scholarships provided under this act shall not be reduced as provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection, but the institution may reduce its annual institutional scholarship commitment to the student by an amount not to exceed the Hathaway scholarship funds provided to the student, excluding need based scholarships provided under W.S.

21-16-1306

, so that the Hathaway scholarship supplants and is not an addition to the institutional scholarship. To the extent that the institution reduces its scholarship commitments under this paragraph, the institution shall specify the purposes for which those commitments were reallocated in its report required under section 4 of this act.

“(b) For purposes of this section “scholarship commitment” means an existing scholarship, a scholarship award letter or a scholarship offer made by the eligible institution.”

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 6, states: “The scholarships provided under this act shall begin for students graduating from an eligible high school or a home-based educational program or receiving a GED after April 1, 2006 and shall be provided beginning with the fall semester 2006.”

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1 and Laws 2006, ch. 70, § 1 both added an Article 13 to Title 21, chapter 16. The article added by ch. 70 has been redesignated as Article 14 in Title 21, chapter 16 by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

§ 21-16-1301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Academic term” means the fall semester or term or the spring semester or term. In this article, “term” and “semester” have the same meaning except that recipients may elect to use the scholarship during summer school, which except as provided by W.S.

21-16-1304

(h) and

21-16-1305

(e), counts toward the maximum number of terms for which the student is eligible but does not count toward computation of an academic year;

“Academic year” means two (2) consecutive semesters or terms and is the period of time a full-time student is expected to complete the equivalent of at least two (2) semesters of academic work;

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 15, § 2.

“Certificate” means a credential other than a degree as defined in paragraph (vi) of this subsection. A “certificate” is either an associate of applied science degree or indicates satisfactory completion of training in an academic year program of study offered by a Wyoming community college;

“Cost of attendance” means the sum cost of tuition, mandatory fees, room and board, books and supplies, travel and personal expenses to attend an eligible institution as determined annually by the institution in accordance with W.S.

21-16-1306

(b);

“Degree” means a baccalaureate, an associate degree other than a certificate and a graduate or professional degree;

“Department” means the Wyoming department of education;

“Eligible high school” means a public or private secondary school that is located in Wyoming and is accredited or licensed by the department or is exempt from licensure pursuant to W.S. 21-2-406(a)(i);

“Eligible institution” means the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college;

“Equivalent of a full-time semester” means twelve (12) semester hours in a semester;

“Expenditure account” means the Hathaway scholarship expenditure account established under W.S.

21-16-1302

;

“Grade point average” or “GPA” means the numbered grade average calculated using a 4.0 scale and, beginning school year 2018-2019 and each school year thereafter, for determining initial scholarship eligibility only, shall include a measure to account for academic rigor of courses in accordance with rule and regulation of the department;

“Graduate of an out-of-state high school” means a person attending and graduating from an out-of-state high school pursuant to W.S.

21-4-501

or 21-4-505(a);

“Satisfactory academic progress” means completing at least six (6) semester hours per semester if enrolled for less than twelve (12) semester hours and completing at least twelve (12) semester hours per semester if enrolled for twelve (12) or more semester hours, and meeting such other criteria as established by the eligible institution to ensure the student earns his degree or certificate in a timely manner. The student’s hours of enrollment for purposes of this paragraph shall be the same number of hours of enrollment used to determine the state’s obligation to reimburse the eligible institution for the student’s scholarship under this article. Satisfactory academic progress shall be determined annually following the spring semester, but a student’s scholarship may be reinstated pursuant to W.S.

21-16-1304

(f)(i) or

21-16-1305

(d)(i) following any semester or summer school session;

“Scholarship” means an award provided pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1304, 21-16-1305 or

21-16-1306

;

“Semester hour” means each nonremedial semester hour attempted for credit toward a postsecondary degree or certificate;

“Title IV” means Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended;

“Unmet financial need” means the cost of attendance minus the sum of expected family contribution and all federal, state, local, institutional and privately funded scholarships or grants received by the student, all as determined by the eligible institution. The institution shall use the most recent federal free application for federal student aid form to determine expected family contribution and shall do so annually in accordance with W.S. 21-16-1306(b);

“Career-technical aptitude assessment score” means qualifying scores on an assessment measuring fundamental workplace skills. The department shall specify by rule and regulation a career-technical aptitude assessment test to be used;

“National percentile rank” means the percentage of scores that fall at or below a given score on a standardized college entrance examination. For purposes of this article, the national percentile ranks are the foundation of an equi-percentile linking method, based on student performance in school year 2015-2016, to determine the scores required on a standardized college entrance examination for scholarship eligibility.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1; 2007, ch. 110, § 1; 2008, ch. 96, § 1; 2009, ch. 169, § 1; 2013 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 15, § 1, 2, effective March 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 171, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2019 ch. 28, § 1, effective February 15, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

in (a)(vi) deleted “or” preceding “an associate degree” and inserted “and a graduate or professional degree.”

Laws 2007, ch. 110, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

added the last sentence in (a)(xiv).

Laws 2008, ch. 96, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(xiii), added “or 21-4-505(a)” at the end.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “high school” for “general educational development (GED)”; and substituted “certificate” for “diploma” in (a)(xvi).

Laws 2013, ch. 25, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 14, 2013.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(i), inserted “except as provided by W.S. 21 16 1304(h) and 21 16 1305(e).”

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 15 § 1, add (a)(xx).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 15 § 2, repealed former (a)(iii), which read: ""ACT score" means a composite score on the American College Test or an equivalent score on the Scholastic Aptitude Test."

Laws 2016, ch. 15, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2016.

The 2017 amendment,

added (a)(xiii) and in (a)(xvi) substituted “postsecondary degree or certificate” for “degree or certificate,” deleted the end of the section text which formerly read: “excluding any semester hour attempted before earning a high school diploma or high school equivalency certificate,” and made related changes.

Laws 2017, ch. 171, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2019 amendment,

in (a)(xix), substituted “Career-technical aptitude assessment score” for “WORKKEYS SCORE” at the beginning, substituted “as assessment measuring fundamental workplace skills. The” for “the WORKKEYS job skills assessment test. In the event the WORKKEYS job skills assessment test is superseded, becomes too expensive to administer or goes out of general use, the” and substituted “career-technical aptitude assessment” for “replacement” near the end.

Laws 2019, ch. 28, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

Laws 2007, ch. 110, § 2, states: “The department of education, in consultation with the University of Wyoming and the community colleges, shall conduct an analysis of the administrative and fiscal feasibility of expanding student scholarships under the Hathaway scholarship program to include private in-state institutions and student scholarship enhancement based upon meritorious academic performance. The department, together with the university and colleges, shall report findings of the analysis and subsequent recommendations to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint education interim committee on or before November 1, 2007.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2008, ch. 96, § 2, provides:

“This act shall apply to Hathaway scholarships lost during the 2006-2007 and 2007-2008 academic year for failure to make satisfactory academic progress, to maintain the required grade point average or for failure to maintain continuous enrollment, all as required by law, if the scholarship recipient otherwise remains eligible for the awarded scholarship pursuant to law and the applicable number of full-time equivalent semesters and the maximum scholarship eligibility time period specified by law, including any semesters for which a Hathaway scholarship was not received, have not been reached.”

§ 21-16-1302.
Hathaway scholarship expenditure account created; reserve account created; use and appropriation of funds.

The Hathaway scholarship expenditure account is created to consist of earnings from the Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund created by W.S. 9-4-204(u)(vii) and such other funds appropriated by the legislature to the expenditure account. Eighty percent (80%) of all monies deposited to the expenditure account under this section shall be available for scholarships under W.S.

21-16-1304

and

21-16-1305

. Twenty percent (20%) of all monies deposited to the expenditure account under this section shall be available for scholarships under W.S.

21-16-1306

. Monies within the expenditure account are continuously appropriated to the state treasurer for distribution to eligible institutions based on scholarships awarded under this article. All unexpended and unencumbered monies within the expenditure account at the end of each fiscal year shall be deposited by the state treasurer to the Hathaway student scholarship reserve account.

There is created the Hathaway student scholarship reserve account. The reserve account shall consist of those monies deposited to the account pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and such other funds appropriated by the legislature to the reserve account. Interest and other earnings on funds within the reserve account shall be credited to the reserve account. To the extent funds within the Hathaway scholarship expenditure account are insufficient in any fiscal year to fully fund scholarships awarded under this article, monies within the reserve account shall be deposited by the state treasurer to the expenditure account for distribution to eligible institutions to fund those scholarships. As soon as possible after the end of each of the fiscal years beginning on and after July 1, 2007, the state treasurer shall transfer monies from this reserve account to the Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund to the extent monies within the reserve account are in excess of the greater of twelve million dollars ($12,000,000.00) or an amount equal to four and one-half percent (4.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the Hathaway student scholarship endowment fund, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year. The state treasurer shall report not later than November 1, of each year to the joint education interim committee and the select committee on capital financing and investments the amount of funds within the reserve account at the end of the previous fiscal year and as of July 1, of the current fiscal year.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1; 2007, ch. 148, § 1; 2011, ch. 10, § 1; 2012, ch. 22, § 1; 2017 ch. 151, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

in (a), substituted “fund” for “account,” and substituted “9-4-204(u)(vii)” for “21-16-1201”; substituted “fund” for account” twice in (b), and added the last sentence.

Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted “November 1” for “September 30.”

The 2012 amendment,

added the present third sentence in (b).

Laws 2012, ch. 22, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

The 2017 amendment,

in the middle of (b), substituted “four and one-half percent (4.5%)” for “three and seventy-five hundredths percent.”

Laws 2017, ch. 151, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 6, 2017.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), substituted “joint education interim committee” for “education committee.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 148, § 3, provides: “Funds distributed from the excellence in higher education endowment account prior to the effective date of this act pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1201(c) and made available for investment by higher education foundations pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1202(a) and 21-16-1203(a) shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the excellence in higher education endowment fund as provided in this section. The state treasurer in consultation with the University of Wyoming, each community college and each foundation investing those funds shall provided for the remittance of those funds or investments purchased with those funds as expeditiously as possible, but may delay the remittance in accordance with prudent investment standards in order to maximize total net earnings.”

§ 21-16-1303.
Hathaway scholarship program; eligibility requirements.

There is created the Hathaway scholarship program for Wyoming students.

Under the Hathaway scholarship program, subject to availability of funds as determined by the legislature, the state shall provide a scholarship pursuant to W.S.

21-16-1304

and

21-16-1305

to any student who has been accepted by and enrolls in an eligible institution to pursue a degree or certificate, and who meets the following qualifications:

The student has demonstrated Wyoming residency as determined by the eligible institution at which the student is enrolled;

The student has successfully completed a curriculum as established under W.S.

21-16-1307

and meets standards for admission to the eligible institution;

The student has:

Graduated from an eligible high school or is otherwise eligible under rules promulgated pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1308(b)(iii) and (iv). The department shall by rule and regulation establish exceptions to the requirements of this subparagraph for students who have attended an eligible high school in Wyoming, but who subsequently graduate from a secondary educational institution in another state or a foreign country that is the equivalent of a high school. An exception under this subparagraph shall be granted only if:

The student’s custodial parent or lawful guardian is a Wyoming resident at the time of application for a scholarship under this article and was a Wyoming resident during the student’s attendance at the eligible high school;

The student’s absence from this state was due to the custodial parent’s or lawful guardian’s employment requirements or was necessitated by other conditions beyond the reasonable control of the parent or guardian; and

Neither the student nor the student’s custodial parent or lawful guardian claimed residency in any other state or foreign country for any purpose during the student’s high school attendance.

Applied for a scholarship under this article within four (4) years of the date of high school graduation, or is otherwise eligible under rules promulgated pursuant to W.S. 21-16-1308(b)(iii) and (iv). The department shall by rule and regulation establish exceptions to the requirement of this subparagraph for military service, religious service and other good cause shown; and

The minimum high school cumulative grade point average and minimum score, as determined through an equi-percentile linking method, on a college entrance examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance or minimum cumulative career-technical aptitude assessment score specified under this article for the type of scholarship to be awarded.

Notwithstanding W.S. 21-16-l301(a)(viii), students who are Wyoming residents and graduates of an out-of-state high school shall be deemed to have graduated from an eligible high school for the purpose of qualifying under this article. Notwithstanding W.S. 21-16-1301(a)(viii) or paragraph (b)(i) of this section, a student whose custodial parent or guardian is in active military service and maintains Wyoming as that parent’s or guardian’s state of domicile is deemed to be a Wyoming resident and if a high school graduate of a high school outside of Wyoming accredited by the appropriate regional accrediting agency shall be deemed to have graduated from an eligible high school for the purpose of qualifying under this article.

No student shall be eligible for a scholarship under this article for more than the equivalent of eight (8) full-time semesters. Except as provided by subsection (f) of this section, no student shall be eligible for a scholarship under this article for any semesters commencing after six (6) academic years following the student’s initial eligibility. For purposes of this subsection a student’s initial eligibility shall be deemed to commence with the first semester in which the state is obligated to reimburse an eligible institution for the student’s scholarship under this article. The department shall by rule and regulation establish exceptions to this subsection for military service, religious service and other good cause shown.

A student is not eligible for a scholarship under this article if he:

Is not a United States citizen or a permanent resident alien who meets the definition of an eligible noncitizen under federal Title IV requirements or requirements of a subsequent similar federal enactment;

Has not complied with United States selective service system requirements for registration, if the requirements are applicable to the student;

Is in default on a federal Title IV education loan. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a student who is otherwise eligible for a scholarship under this article and has fully repaid a defaulted loan or is no longer in default, from receiving a scholarship for future academic semesters;

Owes a refund under a federal Title IV student financial aid program or a subsequently enacted similar federal student financial aid program, or a student financial aid program administered through the state. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a student who is otherwise eligible for a scholarship under this article and has fully paid the refund owed, from receiving a scholarship for future academic semesters;

Is incarcerated;

Has been convicted of a felony in this state or another jurisdiction and has not been granted an exception by the department of education as provided for in W.S. 21-16-1308(b)(v);

Does not otherwise qualify under this article for a scholarship; or

Is currently receiving a scholarship under the Wyoming’s tomorrow scholarship program established under W.S.

21-16-1901

et seq.

Students meeting the requirements of this subsection shall not be subject to the six (6) academic year limitation on scholarships under this article, the satisfactory academic progress requirements of W.S. 21-16-1304(c)(i) and 21-16-1305(b)(i) or the continuous enrollment requirements of W.S. 21-16-1304(c)(ii) and 21-16-1305(b)(ii), but shall be subject to the following:

Have been initially eligible for and received a Hathaway scholarship;

Have received an associate of applied science degree from an eligible institution;

Have engaged in a vocation related to the associate of applied science degree after initially receiving a Hathaway scholarship;

Within the earlier of eight (8) years of initial Hathaway scholarship eligibility or four (4) years of last attending an eligible institution while receiving a Hathaway scholarship, have enrolled at the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college to complete a baccalaureate of applied science degree and have applied for reinstatement of the student’s Hathaway scholarship;

Upon application for reinstatement of the Hathaway scholarship, be subject to the maintenance grade point average and other eligibility requirements under this article;

Upon reinstatement of eligibility, be subject to the satisfactory academic progress requirements of W.S. 21-16-1304(c)(i) and 21-16-1305(b)(i) and the continuous enrollment requirements of W.S. 21-16-1304(c)(ii) and 21-16-1305(b)(ii);

Not have received a Hathaway scholarship for more than the equivalent of four (4) full-time semesters; and

Not be eligible for a scholarship under this article:

For more than a total of the equivalent of eight (8) full-time semesters; nor

For any semesters commencing after ten (10) academic years following the student’s initial eligibility.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1; 2007, ch. 110, § 1; ch. 187, § 1; 2016 ch. 15, § 1, effective March 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 65, § 1, effective March 12, 2018; 2019 ch. 28, § 1, effective February 15, 2019; 2019 ch. 199, § 1, effective March 15, 2019; 2022 ch. 52, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

For tuition and fees for survivors of emergency responders, see §

21-16-1501

.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 199 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

Laws 2019, ch. 28, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

Laws 2019, ch. 199 § 3, makes the act effectiveimmediately upon completion of all acts necessary fora bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of theWyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 110, § 1, provided the exception at the beginning of the second sentence in (d); and added (f).

Laws 2007, ch. 110, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 187, § 1, rewrote (b)(ii), inserting “as established under W.S.

21-16-1307

,” and deleting the last sentence regarding the limitations of curricula requirements.

Laws 2007, ch. 187, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in the section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment,

in (b)(iii)(C), substituted “score, as determined through an equi-percentile linking method, on a college entrance examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance or minimum” for “composite ACT or.”

Laws 2016, ch. 15, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2016.

The 2018 amendment,

in (b)(iii)(B), substituted “article within four (4) years” for “article within two (2) years” in the first sentence.

Laws 2018, ch. 65, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2018.

2019 amendments.—

Laws 2019, ch 28, § 1, in (b)(iii)(C), substituted "career-technical aptitude assessment" for "WORKKEYS".

Laws 2019, ch 84, § 1 effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(ii), added "means," in (a)(ii)(A), deleted "and, beginning school year 2019-2020 and each school year thereafter, has performed satisfactorily on performance evaluations implemented by the district under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xvii) during this period of time," in (a)(ii)(B), deleted "and, beginning school year 2019-2020 and each school year thereafter, has performed satisfactorily on performance evaluations conducted by both districts under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xvii) during this period of time," and made related changes.

Laws 2019, ch 199 § 1, in (f)(iv), added "or a Wyoming community college" following "University of Wyoming."

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (e)(viii) and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 110, § 2 states as follows: “The department of education, in consultation with the University of Wyoming and the community colleges, shall conduct an analysis of the administrative and fiscal feasibility of expanding student scholarships under the Hathaway scholarship program to include private in-state institutions and student scholarship enhancement based upon meritorious academic performance. The department, together with the university and colleges, shall report findings of the analysis and subsequent recommendations to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint education interim committee on or before November 1, 2007.”